Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 7
COLORADO COOPERATIVE EXTENSION
SERVICE

23-31-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Cooperative Extension Service Act".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 543, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-101 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-702. Acknowledgment of related federal laws.

Section 23-31-511, accepting and assenting to the provisions, terms, and conditions of the act of congress known as the "Smith-Lever Act" (38 Stat. 372) providing for cooperative extension programs, is acknowledged.

Subsequent congressional enactments, including the "National Agricultural Research, Extension, and Teaching Policy Act of 1977" (Title XIV, Public Law 95-113, September 29, 1977), the "International Food and Agricultural Development Act of 1975" (Title XII, Public Law 94-161, December 20, 1975), and the "Rural Development Act of 1972" (Title V, Public Law 92-419, October 3, 1972), are acknowledged as authorizing, supplementing, expanding, and redefining the federal role in cooperative extension programs, including those conducted in cooperation with the Colorado cooperative extension service.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to oblige the state in any way to institute or maintain with state funds any program in contravention of the laws of Colorado or the interest of the general assembly in providing for the education needs of the people.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 543, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-102 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-703. Responsibility and objectives.

Primary responsibility, according to section 23-31-702, for statewide programs of educational noncredit, informal extension conducted through cooperative federal, state, and county relationships and as more particularly authorized in this part 7 shall continue to lie with the Colorado state university cooperative extension service, referred to in this part 7 as the "service".

The objectives of the service's programs shall continue to be the dissemination of information to the people of this state in order to assist them in applying the results of scientific research and technological developments, as well as lessons from practical experience, to the solution of individual, family, and community problems, drawing on relevant knowledge from various fields, including but not limited to agriculture, natural resources, home economics, nutrition, health, citizenship, and community and economic development.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 543, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-103 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-704. Organization - cooperative relationships.

The service is an organizational unit of the Colorado state university, under the supervision and control of the university's administration and the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Programs of the service shall reflect and respond to problems, needs, and opportunities in the state and its regions as formulated and articulated through the participation and involvement of the people, and said programs shall be conducted in accordance with program plans pursuant to agreements with federal and state agencies and with local governments and shall be consistent with authorizations of the congress, the general assembly, and local governments.

In support of program objectives, the service is authorized, pursuant to the policies of the university and the service's governing board, to enter into contracts and agreements with the United States department of agriculture, other federal departments and agencies, state departments, agencies, and institutions, county and other local governments, and private organizations and associations to further extension programs and to provide for funding and administration of said programs.

The service is authorized to establish a state advisory committee, which shall consist of no more than eighteen members who shall equitably represent all regions of the state, to assist in the planning, implementation, and evaluation of the extension programs statewide; is authorized to cooperate with boards of county commissioners in the creation of county or area advisory committees to assist local extension personnel in planning, developing, implementing, and evaluating programs and performance; may establish administrative standards, operating procedures, and methods for utilizing such advisory committees; and may make the utilization of said standards, operating procedures, and methods for utilizing such advisory committees a basis for program cooperation and coordination.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 544, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-104 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-705. Authority to accomplish purposes of part.

The service is authorized, pursuant to applicable university, state, and federal policies and procedures, to spend appropriated funds, to collect and expend reasonable and proper service fees, to employ personnel, purchase materials and supplies, and to take other necessary action to facilitate the accomplishment of the purposes of this part 7, including but not limited to the following:

Training of group leaders and directing of group educational activities;

Conduct of workshops, institutes, conferences, and noncredit short courses at Colorado state university or at convenient locations in the state;

Use of demonstrations and other appropriate educational methods and dissemination of information by appropriate means, including press, radio, television, and other forms of communication;

Cooperation with federal, state, and local agencies, other universities and colleges, private organizations, and institutions to further program objectives; and

Development of interstate and multicounty administrative or program arrangements, memoranda of understanding, and agreements to achieve state extension objectives.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 544, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-105 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-706. Reporting and accountability.

In addition to such reports as may be required under federal laws and agreements, the service shall:

Provide annual reports to the governor reviewing activities and goal accomplishments, assessing the value and significance of extension program activities, and indicating problems, needs, and opportunities, especially such as might require the attention of the general assembly and the governor. Six copies of each report shall be filed with the legislative council.

Prepare such other information as may be requested by the general assembly or the governor in areas of the service's concern and responsibility.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 545, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-34-106 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-707. Colorado AgrAbility project - extension program - creation - appropriation - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that Colorado should expand the Colorado AgrAbility project by providing funding for the project's rural rehabilitation specialists with the goal of informing, educating, and assisting farmers, ranchers, and farm workers with disabilities and their families so they can continue to have successful careers in agriculture.

Colorado state university shall implement and administer the Colorado AgrAbility project, referred to in this section as the "AgrAbility project", in cooperation with the federal government pursuant to the "Food, Agriculture, Conservation, and Trade Act of 1990", as amended. Colorado state university shall expand the AgrAbility project by providing rural rehabilitation specialists with funding to provide information, services, and research-based, stress-assistance information, education, suicide prevention training, and referrals to behavioral health-care services to farmers, ranchers, agricultural workers, and their families to mitigate incidences of harmful responses to stress experienced by these individuals. Rural rehabilitation specialists shall be culturally responsive and trauma-informed.

For the 2021-22 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall annually appropriate nine hundred thousand dollars to Colorado state university for the AgrAbility project to expand behavioral health education and services pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Nothing in this section prevents Colorado state university from complying with federal requirements for the AgrAbility project in order for Colorado state university to qualify for federal funds under the federal "Food, Agriculture, Conservation, and Trade Act of 1990", as amended.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2363, § 7, effective June 28.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.